src/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! !!!Conjunctions

LEXICON CC 
+CC: #;

LEXICON Conjunction 
mes   CC "but" ;
hag  CC "and (before vowels)" ;
ha   CC "and (before consonants)" ;
nag  CC "nor (before cons.)" ;
na   CC "nor (before vowels)" ;
po   CC "or" ;
bo   CC "or" ;
py   CC "or" ;
poken CC "or else" ;
boken CC "or else" ;
marnas CC "unless, except" ;
ma's CC "unless, except" ;
saw CC "save, unless, only" ;
keffrys% ha CC "as well as" ;
kekeffrys% ha CC "as well as" ;
kehys% ha CC "as long as" ;
rag CC "for" ;
ytho CC "then, so" ;
may CC "so that" ;
mar CC "if (before cons.)" ;
mara CC "if (before cons.)" ;
mars CC "if (before vowels)" ;
maras CC "if (before vowels)" ;
kyn CC "although" ;
a-ban CC "since, because" ;
awos CC "because" ;
drefen CC "because" ;
pan CC "since" ;
bys% pan CC "until when" ;
erna CC "until" ;
hedra CC "while" ;
kyns CC "before" ;
kyns% es CC "before" ;
kettel CC "as soon as" ;
warlergh CC "after" ;
wosa CC "after" ;
dell CC "as" ;
kepar% ha% pan CC "just as" ;
